Maryland, session 2025, SB0342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
SUBTITLE 9. VOTING RIGHTS – COUNTIES AND MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS.
8–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “POLARIZED VOTING” MEANS VOTING IN WHICH THERE IS A
DIFFERENCE, AS DEFINED IN FEDERAL CASE LAW REGARDING ENFORCEMENT OF
THE FEDERAL VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965, IN THE CHOICE OF CANDIDATES OR
OTHER ELECTORAL CHOICES THAT ARE PREFERRED BY VOTERS IN A PROTECTED
CLASS AND IN THE CHOICE OF CANDIDATES AND ELECTORAL CHOICES THAT ARE
PREFERRED BY VOTERS IN THE REST OF THE ELECTORATE.
(C) “PROTECTED CLASS” MEANS A CLASS OF VOTERS WHO ARE MEMBERS
OF A RACE, COLOR, OR LANGUAGE MINORITY GROUP, AS THIS CLASS IS REFERENCED
AND DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965 AND IN RELATED
FEDERAL CASE LAW.
8–902.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO ELECTIONS IN A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO STATEWIDE ELECTIONS.
8–903.
(A) A METHOD FOR ELECTING THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY NOT BE IMPOSED OR APPLIED IN A MANNER THAT
IMPAIRS THE ABILITY OF MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS TO ELECT CANDIDATES
OF THE MEMBERS’ CHOICE OR THE MEMBERS’ ABILITY TO INFLUENCE THE
OUTCOME OF AN ELECTION AS A RESULT OF THE DILUTION OR THE ABRIDGEMENT
OF THE RIGHTS OF VOTERS WHO ARE MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS.
(B) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS ESTABLISHED IF:

SENATE BILL 342 3
(1) ELECTIONS IN A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION EXHIBIT
POLARIZED VOTING; AND
(2) THE METHOD OF ELECTION DILUTES OR ABRIDGES THE VOTING
STRENGTH OF MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS TO ELECT A CANDIDATE OF THE
MEMBERS’ CHOICE OR THE MEMBERS’ ABILITY TO INFLUENCE THE OUTCOME OF AN
ELECTION, AS DEMONSTRATED BY THE EXISTENCE OF ONE OR MORE METHODS OF
ELECTION THAT COULD BE CONSTITUTIONALLY ADOPTED THAT WOULD LIKELY
MITIGATE THE DILUTION.
8–904.
(A) TO DETERMINE WHETHER THERE IS POLARIZED VOTING UNDER §
8–903(B)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE METHODOLOGIES FOR ESTIMATING GROUP VOTING
BEHAVIOR, AS APPROVED IN FEDERAL CASE LAW, TO ENFORCE THE FEDERAL
VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965;
(2) ELECTIONS OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;
(3) BALLOT QUESTION ELECTIONS;
(4) ELECTIONS WHERE AT LEAST ONE CANDIDATE IS A MEMBER OF A
PROTECTED CLASS; AND
(5) OTHER ELECTORAL CHOICES THAT AFFECT THE RIGHTS AND
PRIVILEGES OF MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS.
(B) (1) ELECTIONS THAT ARE CONDUCTED BEFORE THE FILING OF AN
ACTION TO ENFORCE § 8–903(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE MORE PROBATIVE TO
ESTABLISH THE EXISTENCE OF POLARIZED VOTING THAN ELECTIONS CONDUCTED
AFTER THE FILING OF AN ACTION.
(2) THE ELECTION OF CANDIDATES WHO ARE MEMBERS OF A
PROTECTED CLASS AND WHO WERE ELECTED BEFORE THE FILING OF AN ACTION TO
ENFORCE § 8–903(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT PRECLUDE A FINDING OF
POLARIZED VOTING THAT RESULTS IN AN UNEQUAL OPPORTUNITY FOR A
PROTECTED CLASS TO ELECT CANDIDATES OF THE MEMBERS’ CHOICE.
(C) THE FACT THAT MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS ARE NOT
GEOGRAPHICALLY COMPACT OR CONCENTRATED MAY NOT PRECLUDE A FINDING OF

SENATE BILL 342
POLARIZED VOTING OR A VIOLATION OF § 8–903(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE, BUT IT MAY
BE A FACTOR THAT IS CONSIDERED IN DETERMINING AN APPROPRIATE REMEDY.
8–905.
IN DETERMINING WHETHER A VIOLATION OF § 8–903(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE
HAS OCCURRED WITH RESPECT TO A PROTECTED CLASS, THE COURT MAY CONSIDER
EVIDENCE RELEVANT TO WHETHER PROTECTED CLASS MEMBERS ARE VULNERABLE
TO OR OTHERWISE AT RISK OF VOTING DISCRIMINATION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE HISTORY AND EFFECTS OF DISCRIMINATION; AND
(2) THE EXTENT TO WHICH PROTECTED CLASS MEMBERS ENCOUNTER
BARRIERS, DISPARITIES, OR HOSTILITY REGARDING POLITICAL PARTICIPATION
AND CIVIC LIFE.
8–906.
(A) A THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND ANY OTHER PERSON
MAY BRING AN ACTION TO ENFORCE § 8–903 OF THIS SUBTITLE IN THE COUNTY
WHERE THE VIOLATION ALLEGEDLY OCCURRED FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF,
DAMAGES, OR OTHER RELIEF.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE COURT
FINDS A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT SHALL HAVE BROAD AUTHORITY
TO OTHER APPROPRIATE REMEDIES THAT ARE TAILORED TO ADDRESS THE
VIOLATION.
(2) A COURT MAY NOT ORDER THE ADOPTION OF A METHOD OF
ELECTION THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH THE METHODS OF ELECTIONS IN USE IN
COUNTIES IN THE STATE WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE RELEVANT JURISDICTION.
(C) (1) THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER REMEDIES PROPOSED BY ANY
PARTIES TO THE ACTION OR INTERESTED PARTIES.
(2) THE COURT MAY NOT GIVE DEFERENCE OR PRIORITY TO A
PROPOSED REMEDY BECAUSE IT IS PROPOSED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION.
(D) A COURT MAY GRANT PRELIMINARY RELIEF REQUESTED UNDER THIS
SECTION REGARDING AN UPCOMING ELECTION IF THE COURT DETERMINES:
(1) THAT THE PARTY IS MORE LIKELY THAN NOT TO SUCCEED ON THE
MERITS; AND

SENATE BILL 342 5
(2) IT IS POSSIBLE TO IMPLEMENT AN APPROPRIATE REMEDY THAT
WOULD RESOLVE THE VIOLATION ALLEGED UNDER THIS SECTION BEFORE THE
ELECTION.
Article – Local Government
SUBTITLE 6. VOTING RIGHTS – MUNICIPALITIES.
4–601.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “POLARIZED VOTING” MEANS VOTING IN WHICH THERE IS A
DIFFERENCE, AS DEFINED IN FEDERAL CASE LAW REGARDING ENFORCEMENT OF
THE FEDERAL VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965, IN THE CHOICE OF CANDIDATES OR
OTHER ELECTORAL CHOICES THAT ARE PREFERRED BY VOTERS IN A PROTECTED
CLASS AND IN THE CHOICE OF CANDIDATES AND ELECTORAL CHOICES THAT ARE
PREFERRED BY VOTERS IN THE REST OF THE ELECTORATE.
(C) “PROTECTED CLASS” MEANS A CLASS OF VOTERS WHO ARE MEMBERS
OF A RACE, COLOR, OR LANGUAGE MINORITY GROUP, AS THIS CLASS IS REFERENCED
AND DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965 AND IN RELATED
FEDERAL CASE LAW.
4–602.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO ELECTIONS IN A MUNICIPALITY.
4–603.
(A) A METHOD FOR ELECTING THE GOVERNING BODY OF A MUNICIPALITY
MAY NOT BE IMPOSED OR APPLIED IN A MANNER THAT IMPAIRS THE ABILITY OF
MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS TO ELECT CANDIDATES OF THE MEMBERS’
CHOICE OR THE MEMBERS’ ABILITY TO INFLUENCE THE OUTCOME OF AN ELECTION
AS A RESULT OF THE DILUTION OR THE ABRIDGEMENT OF THE RIGHTS OF VOTERS
WHO ARE MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS.
(B) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS ESTABLISHED IF:
(1) ELECTIONS IN A MUNICIPALITY EXHIBIT POLARIZED VOTING; AND

SENATE BILL 342
(2) THE METHOD OF ELECTION DILUTES OR ABRIDGES THE VOTING
STRENGTH OF MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS TO ELECT A CANDIDATE OF THE
MEMBERS’ CHOICE OR THE MEMBERS’ ABILITY TO INFLUENCE THE OUTCOME OF AN
ELECTION.
4–604.
(A) TO DETERMINE WHETHER THERE IS POLARIZED VOTING UNDER §
4–603(B)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE METHODOLOGIES FOR ESTIMATING GROUP VOTING
BEHAVIOR, AS APPROVED IN FEDERAL CASE LAW, TO ENFORCE THE FEDERAL
VOTING RIGHTS ACT OF 1965;
(2) ELECTIONS OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPALITY;
(3) BALLOT QUESTION ELECTIONS;
(4) ELECTIONS WHERE AT LEAST ONE CANDIDATE IS A MEMBER OF A
PROTECTED CLASS; AND
(5) OTHER ELECTORAL CHOICES THAT AFFECT THE RIGHTS AND
PRIVILEGES OF MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS.
(B) (1) ELECTIONS THAT ARE CONDUCTED BEFORE THE FILING OF AN
ACTION TO ENFORCE § 4–603(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE MORE PROBATIVE TO
ESTABLISH THE EXISTENCE OF POLARIZED VOTING THAN ELECTIONS CONDUCTED
AFTER THE FILING OF AN ACTION.
(2) THE ELECTION OF CANDIDATES WHO ARE MEMBERS OF A
PROTECTED CLASS AND WHO WERE ELECTED BEFORE THE FILING OF AN ACTION TO
ENFORCE § 4–603(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT PRECLUDE A FINDING OF
POLARIZED VOTING THAT RESULTS IN AN UNEQUAL OPPORTUNITY FOR A
PROTECTED CLASS TO ELECT CANDIDATES OF THE MEMBERS’ CHOICE.
(C) THE FACT THAT MEMBERS OF A PROTECTED CLASS ARE NOT
GEOGRAPHICALLY COMPACT OR CONCENTRATED MAY NOT PRECLUDE A FINDING OF
POLARIZED VOTING OR A VIOLATION OF § 4–603(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE, BUT IT MAY
BE A FACTOR THAT IS CONSIDERED.
4–605.

SENATE BILL 342 7
A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION TO ENFORCE § 4–603 OF THIS SUBTITLE IN
THE MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE VIOLATION ALLEGEDLY OCCURRED FOR
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, DAMAGES, OR OTHER RELIEF.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if a court issues a holding
that affects the application of a provision of this Act, the ruling does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the affected
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.